Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.120

Change deemed complete, when.

Upon the filing of the papers with the clerk of the court to which the cause is transferred, the change of venue shall be deemed complete, and thereafter the action shall proceed as though it had been commenced in that court.

[Code 1881 s 57; 1877 p 13 s 58; 1869 p 15 s 58; 1854 p 135 s 22; RRS s 218.]